Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 3. Psychiatric Advance Directives

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1999, ch. 167, § 2, had provided that this article would be repealed effective July 1, 2003. Laws 2003, ch. 184, § 1, repealed that repeal provision.

§ 35-22-301.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Adult” means a person eighteen (18) years of age or older;

“Agent” means any person authorized in the psychiatric advance directive to make decisions on behalf of the person who executed the directive;

“Psychiatric advance directive” means an advance medical directive pertaining to the administration or refusal of psychiatric restabilization for the care and treatment of mental illness;

“Psychiatric personnel” means any licensed physician who specializes in psychiatric care;

“Psychiatric restabilization” means measures to restore mental function or to support mental health in the event of destabilization of mental health due to lack of appropriate treatment. Psychiatric restabilization measures include administration of prescribed liquid medication by mouth or injection, administration of prescribed medication orally, physical restraint, seclusion or crisis psychiatric counseling;

“This act” means W.S.

35-22-301

through

35-22-308

.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 167, § 1; Laws 2003, ch. 184, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-22-302.
Psychiatric advance directives; who may execute.

Any adult who has the decisional capacity to provide informed consent to or refusal of psychiatric restabilization measures or any other person who is, pursuant to the laws of this state or any other state, authorized to consent to or refuse psychiatric restabilization measures on behalf of a person who lacks the decisional capacity, may execute a psychiatric advance directive.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 167, § 1; Laws 2003, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 35-22-303.
Psychiatric advance directive forms; duties of department of health.

On or before January 1, 2000, the state department of health shall promulgate rules, protocols and forms for the implementation of psychiatric advance directives by psychiatric personnel. The protocols adopted shall include uniform methods for rapid identification of persons who have executed a psychiatric advance directive, methods to protect the confidentiality of persons who have executed a psychiatric advance directive and the information described in subsection (b) of this section. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict any other manner in which a person may make a psychiatric advance directive. Forms which meet the requirements of law and are consistent with patient rights shall be developed and disseminated throughout the state as recommended forms.

Psychiatric advance directive protocols to be adopted by the state department of health shall, at a minimum, require the following information concerning the person who is the subject of the psychiatric advance directive:

The person’s name, date of birth and sex;

The person’s eye and hair color;

The person’s race or ethnic background;

The person’s social security number;

If applicable, the name of a treatment program and the sponsoring facility or institution in which the person is enrolled;

The name, address and telephone number of the person’s attending physician or psychiatric personnel;

The person’s signature or mark or, if applicable, the signature of a person authorized by this article to execute a psychiatric advance directive;

The date on which the psychiatric advance directive was signed;

The person’s directive concerning the administration or refusal of psychiatric restabilization measures, countersigned by the person’s attending physician or psychiatric personnel;

The name, address and telephone number of the person designated as an agent, if applicable, to consent to or refuse psychiatric restabilization measures for the person who has executed a psychiatric advance directive and the signature of that person, indicating acceptance of this appointment.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 167, § 1; Laws 2003, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 35-22-304.
Duty to comply; immunity; effect on criminal charges against another person.

Emergency medical service personnel in emergency situations if they are aware of the person’s psychiatric advance directive, psychiatric personnel, health care providers and health care facilities shall comply with a person’s psychiatric advance directive to the extent medically indicated.

Any emergency medical service personnel, psychiatric personnel, health care provider, health care facility or any other person who, reasonably and in good faith, complies with a psychiatric advance directive shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability or regulatory sanction for such compliance.

Compliance by emergency medical service personnel, psychiatric personnel, health care providers or health care facilities with a psychiatric advance directive shall not affect the criminal prosecution of any person otherwise charged with the commission of a criminal act.

In the absence of a psychiatric advance directive, a person’s consent to psychiatric restabilization measures shall not be presumed.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 167, § 1; Laws 2003, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 35-22-305.
Effect of declaration after inpatient admission.

A psychiatric advance directive for any person who is admitted to a health care facility or mental health facility shall be implemented as directed by the psychiatric advance directive, pending further physician’s orders. The psychiatric advance directive may be deviated from only with the consent of the admitted person, his agent, the district court or when adherence to the directive threatens permanent physical injury.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 167, § 1; Laws 2003, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 35-22-306.
Effect of directive on life or health insurance.

Neither a psychiatric advance directive nor the failure of a person to execute one shall affect, impair or modify any contract of life or health insurance or annuity or be the basis for any delay in issuing or refusing to issue an annuity or policy of life or health insurance or any increase of a premium thereof.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 167, § 1; Laws 2003, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 35-22-307.
Revocation of psychiatric advance directive.

A psychiatric advance directive may be revoked at any time by the person who is the subject of the directive unless he is mentally incompetent or at any time by any other person who is, pursuant to the laws of this state or any other state, authorized to consent to or refuse psychiatric restabilization measures on behalf of the person who is the subject of the directive.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 167, § 1; Laws 2003, ch. 184, § 1.

§ 35-22-308.
Duration of psychiatric advance directive.

A psychiatric advance directive shall be valid for a period not to exceed two (2) years from the date of execution unless reaffirmed by the person who executed the directive, in which case it shall be valid for two (2) years from the date of reaffirmation.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 167, § 1; Laws 2003, ch. 184, § 1.